New Mexico, session 2026, HB195.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of Chapter 42, Article 10 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] JUDGMENTS AGAINST INDEPENDENT PROVIDERS.-- A. A plaintiff who makes a medical malpractice claim shall not pursue, collect or execute on a judgment against the personal income of an independent provider or the personal assets owned by an independent provider if the court finds that the independent provider maintained: (1) qualification under the provisions of the Medical Malpractice Act pursuant to Section 41-5-5 NMSA 1978; or (2) an insurance policy with a policy limit on recovery of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) per occurrence. B. For the purposes of this section, "independent provider" means a natural person who is a licensed physician, chiropractic physician, podiatric physician, certified registered nurse anesthetist, physician assistant, certified nurse practitioner, certified clinical nurse specialist or certified nurse-midwife." SECTION 2. APPLICABILITY.--The provisions of this act apply to all medical malpractice claims brought on or after the effective date of this act. - 2 -